Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 3
CHARTERS

11-109-301. Incorporators.

Five or more individual incorporators desiring to organize a trust company shall file with the banking board an application for charter on the form prescribed by the banking board, together with all other documents required by section 11-109-305, all of which instruments shall be duly signed by each of the incorporators and sworn to before an officer authorized by the laws of this state to administer oaths.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1185, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-104 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-302. Application fee.

Each application for charter shall be accompanied by an application fee established by the banking board pursuant to section 11-102-104 (11). The fee may be refunded to the incorporators if the application is withdrawn prior to the date set for public hearing.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1185, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-105 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-303. Assessments.

The banking board shall annually establish fees and assessments pursuant to section 11-102-104 (11). Assessments may be made more frequently than annually at the discretion of the banking board.

For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1992, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the banking board shall establish its annual assessment to be collected at least semiannually in such amounts as are sufficient to generate the moneys appropriated by the general assembly to the division of banking for each such fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1186, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-105.5 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-304. Capital.

The banking board shall establish by rules the capital standards and guidelines, the methods for measuring capital, and the definitions of "capital", "capital adequacy", "capital inadequacy", and other related terms for trust companies subject to this article, which may differ for specific purposes. In promulgating such rules, the banking board shall consider all relevant factors, including without limitation the policies set forth in section 11-101-102 and relevant federal laws and regulations.

Each trust company subject to this article shall at all times comply with the capital rules promulgated by the banking board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1186, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-305. Application for charter.

After the capital stock has been fully subscribed, the incorporators shall make application to the banking board for a charter. The incorporators shall submit to the banking board the following:

The proposed articles of incorporation in such form as the banking board, pursuant to rules, shall prescribe and as shall be acceptable to the secretary of state for purposes of filing;

An application for a charter in such form and containing such information as the banking board may require.

If the proposed articles of incorporation or application do not comply with the requirements of this article, and with the requirements of the banking board issued pursuant thereto, the banking board shall, within thirty days after the receipt thereof, return both of the said documents to the incorporators, calling attention to the defects therein.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1186, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-108 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-306. Procedure for granting or denying charter.

Within sixty days following the filing of the completed application for charter, the commissioner shall make or cause to be made a careful investigation to determine that the following requirements have been met:

That the applicant has proceeded in a lawful manner;

That the name is not deceptively similar to that of another trust company or otherwise misleading;

That the persons who will serve as directors or officers, insofar as such persons are known, are qualified by character and experience and that the qualifications and financial status of the incorporators, directors, officers, and persons in control of the trust company, as defined in section 11-109-401, are consistent with their responsibilities and duties;

That the proposed capital satisfies the standards and guidelines in the rules promulgated by the banking board;

That the proposed or amended articles of incorporation and bylaws are appropriate or may be amended to be appropriate.

Within ninety days after the filing of the application, the banking board shall conduct a public hearing to consider the application. At least thirty days prior to such hearing, the banking board shall give written notice thereof to all persons doing a trust business in the community in which the proposed trust company is to be located and to such other persons as it may designate. At such hearing, the applicants shall have the burden of proving that:

The public convenience and advantage will be promoted by the establishment of the proposed trust company;

Conditions in the locality in which the proposed trust company will transact business afford reasonable promise of successful operation;

The trust company is being formed for no other purpose than the legitimate objects contemplated by this article;

The applicants have complied with all of the applicable provisions of this article;

The books and records of the proposed trust company will be maintained in Colorado and a substantial portion of the proposed trust company's operations will be conducted in Colorado.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the banking board has given notice pursuant to subsection (2) of this section of a hearing on any application for charter filed pursuant to this section and the banking board has received no written protests against such charter application within ten days before the hearing, the banking board may grant such charter without a hearing as otherwise required in this section if the applicants for such charter are known to the banking board.

Within thirty days after the date of the conclusion of the hearing, the banking board shall grant a charter to the applicants if the banking board determines that the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section have been met.

If the proposed trust company fails to open for business within six months after the date of granting the charter, the privilege of transacting business shall terminate. The banking board, for good cause and upon written application filed prior to the expiration of such six-month period, may extend the time within which the trust company may open for business.

Unless otherwise provided by law to the contrary, articles of incorporation, amended articles of incorporation, or amendments to articles of incorporation shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with the general corporate laws of this state.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1187, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-109 as it existed prior to 2003.